South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3101.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 3, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-3-880.  A guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to Section 63-3-810 is subject to investigation by the Office of Disciplinary Counsel, which shall receive and investigate allegations of ethical misconduct and violations of statutory duty by guardians ad litem in private custody or visitation actions before the family court. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----